California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The applicant has filed with the bureau a classifiable fingerprint card, a completed application for a firearms permit on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true and correct. In lieu of a classifiable fingerprint card, the applicant may submit fingerprints into an electronic fingerprinting system administered by the Department of Justice. An applicant who submits their fingerprints by electronic means shall have their fingerprints entered into the system through a terminal operated by a law enforcement agency or other facility authorized by the Department of Justice to conduct electronic fingerprinting. The terminal operator may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse it for the costs incurred in providing this service.

(d) The applicant is at least 21 years of age and the bureau has determined, after investigation, that the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant, in the course of their duties, presents no apparent threat to the public safety, or that the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant is not in violation of the Penal Code.

(e) The applicant has produced evidence to the firearm training facility that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status shall be deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by persons unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service Form I-151 or United States
 Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(f) The application is accompanied by the application fees prescribed in this chapter.

(g) (1) If the applicant is a registered security guard and they have been found capable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control, for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of their duties, pursuant to Section 7583.47.

(2) The requirement in paragraph (1) shall be completed within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 35.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.24.

(a) The bureau shall not issue a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before issuing an initial firearm permit the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the name, address, social security number, and fingerprints of the applicant.

(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 60 days from receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(d) An applicant who has been denied a firearm
 permit based upon subdivision (a) may reapply for the permit after the prohibition expires. The bureau shall treat this application as an initial application and shall follow the required screening process as specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 25.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.25.

(a) The bureau shall not renew a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, purchasing, or owning a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before renewing a firearm permit, the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the information necessary to identify the renewal applicant.

(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 30 days of receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the renewal applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(d) An applicant who is denied a firearm permit renewal based upon subdivision (a) may reapply for the permit after the prohibition expires. The bureau shall treat this as an initial application and shall follow the screening process specified in Section 7583.24.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 30.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.26.

(a) The Department of Justice may charge the bureau a fee sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing firearm eligibility information upon submission of the application for issuance or renewal of a firearm permit. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service.

(b) The bureau shall collect the fee described in subdivision (a) for all initial and renewal applications for firearm permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.27.

(a) A firearm permit may be revoked if at any time the Department of Justice notifies the bureau that the holder of the firearm permit is prohibited from possessing, receiving, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. Following the automatic revocation, an administrative hearing shall be provided upon written request to the bureau in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The bureau may seek an emergency order pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 11460.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code against the holder of the firearms permit if, after the bureau’s investigation relating to any of the following events, the bureau
 determines that the holder of the firearms permit presents an undue hazard to public safety that may result in substantial injury to another:

(1) Receipt of subsequent arrest information of an arrest for any of the following:

(A) Assault.

(B) Battery.

(C) Any use of force or violence on any person committed by the permitholder.

(2) A report from a bureau-approved firearms training facility or instructor made pursuant to Section 7585.18.

(3) A report from the permitholder’s employer or former employer that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(4) A
 complaint filed by any member of the public that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 26.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.28.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, the application shall be considered to be abandoned. An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of the former application shall be treated as a new application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.29.

If a firearms permit is denied, the denial of the permit shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if the applicant desires a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the denial, the review shall be requested of the director within 30 days following notice of the issuance of the denial. A review or hearing shall be held pursuant to Section 7581.3. However, no review or hearing shall be granted to an individual who is otherwise prohibited by law from carrying a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 27.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.30.

The firearms qualification card, if issued, shall be mailed to the applicant at the address which appears on the application. In the event of the loss or destruction of the card, the cardholder may apply to the bureau for a certified replacement of the card, stating the circumstances surrounding the loss, and pay the fee prescribed in this chapter, whereupon the bureau shall issue a certified replacement of the card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 43.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.31.

A firearms qualification card does not authorize the holder thereof to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person in a concealed manner pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 6.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.32.

(a) A firearms qualification card expires two years from the date of issuance, if not renewed. A person who wishes to renew a firearms qualification card shall file an application for renewal at least 60 days prior to the card’s expiration. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until that person has been issued a renewal card by the bureau.

(b) The bureau shall not renew a firearms qualification card unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The cardholder has filed with the bureau a completed application for renewal of a firearms qualification card, on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury certifying that the
 information on the application is true and correct.

(2) (A) The applicant has requalified on the range and has successfully passed a written examination based on course content as specified in the firearms training manual approved by the department and taught at a training facility approved by the bureau.

(B) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the requirements of subparagraph (A) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms training instructor.

(3) The application is accompanied by a firearms requalification fee as prescribed in this chapter.

(4) The applicant has produced evidence to the
 firearm training facility, either upon receiving their original qualification card or upon filing for renewal of that card, that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status is that deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by persons unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service Form I-151 or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(c) An expired firearms qualification card may not be renewed. A person with an expired registration is required to apply for a new firearms qualification in the
 manner required of persons not previously registered. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until that person has been issued a new firearms qualification card by the bureau.

(d) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to:

(1) A duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course of the officer’s duties and who has successfully completed requalification training within the 12 months preceding the month of the permit’s expiration.

(2) A federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code (18 U.S.C. Sec. 926B), who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course of the officer’s duties and who has successfully
 completed requalification training within the 12 months preceding the month of the permit’s expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 36.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.35.

Every licensee, qualified manager, or a registered uniformed security guard, who in the course of his or her employment carries tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent, shall complete the required course pursuant to Section 22835 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 7.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.36.

A licensee shall not permit any employee to carry tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent prior to ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of tear gas or other nonlethal chemical agent. Evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a training facility approved by the Department of Consumer Affairs, Bureau of Security and Investigative Services that the person is proficient in the use of tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 325, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.37.

The director may assess fines as enumerated in Article 7 (commencing with Section 7587). Assessment of administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau or any local, state, or federal governmental agency that may result from a violation of this article. In addition to other prohibited acts under this chapter, no licensee, qualified manager, or registered security guard shall, during the course and scope of licensed activity, do any of the following:

(a) Carry any inoperable, replica, or other simulated firearm.

(b) Use a firearm in violation of the law, or in knowing violation of the standards for the carrying and usage of firearms as taught in the course of training in the carrying and use of
 firearms. Unlawful or prohibited uses of firearms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Illegally using, carrying, or possessing a dangerous weapon.

(2) Brandishing a weapon.

(3) Drawing a weapon without proper cause.

(4) Provoking a shooting incident without cause.

(5) Carrying or using a firearm while on duty while under the influence of alcohol or dangerous drugs.

(6) Carrying or using a firearm of a caliber for which a firearms permit has not been issued by the bureau.

(7) Carrying or using a firearm while performing duties not related to
 the qualifying license or registration to which the bureau associated the firearms permit.

(c) Carry or use a baton in the performance of their duties, unless they have in their possession a valid baton certificate.

(d) Carry or use tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent in the performance of their duties unless they have in their possession proof of completion of a course in the carrying and use of tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent.

(e) Carry a concealed pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person unless one of the following circumstances applies:

(1) The person has been issued a permit to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person in a concealed manner by
 a local law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215 of the Penal Code.

(2) The person is employed as a guard or messenger of a common carrier, bank, or other financial institution and they carry the weapon while actually employed in and about the shipment, transportation, or delivery of any money, treasure, bullion, bonds, or other thing of value within this state, as specified in Section 25630 of the Penal Code.

(3) The person is an honorably retired peace officer authorized to carry a concealed firearm pursuant to Section 25650 of the Penal Code or Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(4) The person is a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the
 Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm in the course and scope of their employment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 30) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 31.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.38.

A city, county, or city and county may regulate the uniforms and insignias worn by uniformed employees of a private patrol operator and vehicles used by a private patrol operator to make the uniforms and vehicles clearly distinguishable from the uniforms worn by, and the vehicles used by, local regular law enforcement officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.39.

(a) The bureau shall require, as a condition precedent to the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued maintenance of a license, that the applicant or licensee file or have on file with the bureau, an insurance policy, as defined in Section 7583.40.

(b) If a licensee fails to maintain sufficient insurance, as required by this section, or fails to provide proof of the required insurance policy upon request by the bureau, the license shall be automatically suspended by operation of law until the date that the licensee provides proof to the bureau of compliance with the insurance coverage requirement. Prior to an automatic suspension, the bureau shall notify the licensee, in writing, that it has 30 days
 to provide proof to the bureau of having the required insurance policy or the license shall be automatically suspended.

(c) (1) A Certificate of Liability Insurance issued by an authorized agent or employee of the insurer shall be submitted to the bureau electronically, or in a manner authorized by the bureau, for an insurance policy secured by a licensee in satisfaction of this section. The insurer shall list the bureau as the certificate holder for the purposes of receiving notifications related to the policy’s status.

(2) An insurer issuing a Certificate of Liability Insurance pursuant to paragraph (1) shall report the following information to the bureau for an insurance policy required by this section:

(A) The name of the insured.

(B) The licensee’s license number.

(C) The policy number.

(D) The dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and end.

(E) The cancellation date, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 36.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.40.

“Insurance policy,” as used in this article, means a commercial general liability policy of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state that provides minimum limits of insurance of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for any one loss or occurrence due to bodily injury, including death, or property damage, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 4.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.41.

Proof that a licensee maintains an insurance policy as required by this article shall be provided by the licensee to the bureau upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.42.

The failure of a private patrol operator to maintain an insurance policy as required by this article shall constitute grounds for the suspension of the private patrol operator’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.45.

(a) (1) Every security guard working on the property of a K–12 school district or community college district pursuant to a contract with a private licensed security agency shall complete the latest course of training developed by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs. The course shall be developed in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “school district”
 includes a school district, county office of education, and charter school.

(b) (1) A security guard required to register pursuant to this chapter who completes the course of training specified in subdivision (a) shall not be hired on contract to work and shall not continue to work as a school security officer on the property of a K–12 school district or community college district unless both of the following conditions are met:

(A) (i) The applicant or contracted employee has submitted two copies of their fingerprints on forms or electronically, as prescribed by the Department of Justice, to the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs. The Bureau of Security and Investigative
 Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Justice, which shall submit one copy of the fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(ii) An applicant or contracted employee who holds a permanent registration with the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services as a security guard need only submit one copy of their fingerprints, which copy shall be submitted to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(iii) An applicant or contracted employee who is registered by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services, and who holds a firearms qualification card as specified in Section 7583.22, is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) The applicant or contracted employee has been determined not to be prohibited from employment by a K–12 school district pursuant to Sections 44237 and 45122.1 of the Education Code or legally prohibited from employment by a community college, and had been determined by the Department of Justice not to be a person prohibited from possessing a firearm if the applicant is required to carry a firearm.

(2) The Department of Justice may participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) in lieu of submitting fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to meet the requirements of this subdivision relating to firearms.

(c) For purposes of this section, “security guard” means any person primarily employed or assigned
 to provide security services as a watchperson, security guard, or patrolperson on or about premises owned or operated by a school district to protect persons or property, to prevent the theft or unlawful taking of district property of any kind, or to report any unlawful activity to the district and local law enforcement agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.   (SB 390)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.46.

(a) (1) It shall be a violation of Section 1102.5 of the Labor Code for a private patrol operator to discharge, demote, threaten, or in any manner discriminate against an employee in the terms and conditions of his or her employment, for disclosing information or causing information to be disclosed, to a government or law enforcement agency, when the information is related to conduct proscribed in this chapter.

(2) A private patrol operator who intentionally violates this subdivision shall be liable in an action for damages brought against him or her by the injured party.

(b) A person who believes that he or she has been discharged, demoted, threatened, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of his or her employment, because that person disclosed or caused information to be disclosed to a government or law enforcement agency, may bring a claim against the private patrol operator within three years of the date of the discharge, demotion, threat, or discrimination.

(c) Neither the bureau nor the department is responsible for resolving claims under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.47.

(a) As used in this section, “assessment” means the application of a testing instrument identified by the bureau that evaluates whether an applicant for a firearms permit who is a registered security guard, at the time of the assessment, possesses appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of their security guard duties.

(b) The applicant shall complete the assessment, as specified in this section.

(c) (1) The bureau shall implement a process to administer the assessment specified in this section. The establishment of the assessment and the process for administering the assessment shall not be subject to
 the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The bureau shall consult with a California licensed psychologist, psychologists, or other persons with subject matter expertise, whose minimum duties shall include, but are not limited to, assisting the bureau with all of the following:

(A) Establishing criteria for a contract with a vendor to administer the assessment.

(B) Identifying minimum standards for the assessment.

(C) Evaluating currently available assessments.

(D) Providing consultative services on the bids received by the bureau from third-party vendors seeking to administer and interpret the assessment,
 to ensure both of the following:

(i) Compliance with the applicable standards of care for the administration and interpretation of such assessments.

(ii) The assessment will be administered in accordance with the assessment manufacturer’s requirements.

(3) The bureau shall contract with a third-party vendor to administer the assessment. All third-party vendors seeking to administer the assessment must meet the minimum standards established by the bureau, its consultants, and the assessment manufacturer’s requirements for administering the assessment. Considerations for the third-party vendor contract shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Cost to the applicant to complete the assessment.

(B) Geographic accessibility statewide of the assessment to applicants.

(C) Assessment compliance with the established minimum standards for the assessment and assessment process.

(D) Ensuring an assessment carried out on an applicant complies with the applicable professional standards of care for such assessments, as well as the assessment manufacturer’s requirements for administering the assessment.

(d) The applicant, or the applicant’s designee or employer if the employer voluntarily chooses, shall bear the cost of the assessment.

(e) Within 30 days of administering an applicant’s assessment, the vendor shall directly provide the bureau, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the bureau,
 the applicant’s assessment results. If the results of the applicant’s assessment indicate that the applicant is incapable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of the applicant’s duties, at the point in time of the evaluation, the bureau shall not issue a firearms permit. If the applicant fails the assessment, the applicant may complete another assessment no earlier than 180 days after the results of the previous assessment are provided to the bureau.

(f) The application shall be deemed incomplete until the bureau receives the results of the applicant’s assessment and the results indicate that the applicant is capable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of the applicant’s duties.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, an applicant who fails the assessment shall not be entitled to an administrative hearing or an appeal subject to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, such an applicant who is denied a firearms permit may request review of the denial pursuant to Section 7583.29.

(h) The bureau may prescribe, adopt, and enforce emergency regulations, and promulgate regulations to implement this section. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate
 preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(i) The assessment required pursuant to this section shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this section was scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(j) Nothing in this section requires any private business entity that contracts with the bureau for the administration of the assessment to produce documents related to the content, methodology, results, or scoring criteria of the assessment, or any trade secret, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, for any private individual, firm, copartnership, association, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 37.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Baton Permits [7584. - 7584.6.]

7584.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Licensee” means a licensed private patrol operator.

(b) “Qualified law enforcement officer” means either of the following:

(1) A peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) A federal qualified law enforcement officer as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 7584.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a licensee, a qualified manager of a licensee, or a security guard shall not carry a baton in the course of their employment unless the following conditions apply:

(1) The licensee, qualified manager, or security guard is wearing a uniform.

(2) The licensee, qualified manager, or security guard carries on their person a valid license, qualified manager certificate, or security guard registration card issued pursuant to this chapter.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), the licensee, qualified manager, or security guard carries on
 their person a valid baton permit issued to them by the bureau pursuant to this article.

(B) A uniformed baton permitholder may carry or use a baton while on duty pending receipt of a baton permit if they have been approved by the bureau and carry on their person a hard copy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s internet website and a valid picture identification.

(C) This paragraph does not apply to a qualified law enforcement officer who meets all of the following:

(i) The peace officer has successfully completed a course of study in the use of batons.

(ii) The peace officer is authorized to carry a baton in the course and scope of their employment pursuant to Section 22295 of the Penal Code.

(iii) The peace officer has proof that they have applied to the bureau for a baton permit.

(b) This section shall not apply to a duly appointed qualified law enforcement officer who has written approval from the peace officer’s primary employer, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 7583.9, to carry a baton while working as a uniformed security guard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 7584.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.2.

A licensee shall not allow an employee to carry or use a baton in the course of their employment unless the employee possesses a valid and current baton permit issued by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 7584.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.3.

The bureau shall issue a baton permit to an applicant if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The applicant is a sole owner of a sole ownership licensee, a qualified manager of a licensee, a partner of a partnership licensee pursuant to Section 7582.7, or a registered security guard.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), the applicant has completed the course of training in the carrying and use of a baton specified in Section 7585.9 within the six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in
 subdivision (b) of Section 7584, who has successfully completed a course of study in the use of batons within the 24-month period preceding the date of application.

(c) A certified baton training instructor has attested under penalty of perjury that the applicant has successfully completed the baton training course specified in Section 7585.9.

(d) The applicant has completed an application for a baton permit on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, attesting under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true.

(e) The application is accompanied by the application fee prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 38.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.4.

If the bureau denies a baton permit, the bureau shall issue that denial of the permit in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if they desire a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the denial, the applicant is required to request review from the director within 30 days following notice of the issuance of the denial. A review or hearing shall be held pursuant to Section 7581.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 7584.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.5.

(a) A baton permit expires two years from the date of issuance, if not renewed. A person who wishes to renew a baton permit shall file an application for renewal with the bureau at least 60 days before the permit’s expiration. A person whose permit has expired shall not carry a baton in the course of their employment until they possess a valid and current baton permit issued by the bureau.

(b) The bureau shall not renew a baton permit unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The permitholder has filed with the bureau a completed application for renewal of a baton permit, on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant under penalty of
 perjury certifying that the information on the application is true and correct.

(2) (A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), the applicant has completed the baton training course specified in Section 7585.9 within the six months preceding the month of the permit’s expiration.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to a qualified law enforcement officer who is authorized to carry a baton in the course of their duties and who has successfully completed baton training within the 12 months preceding the month of the permit’s expiration.

(3) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), a certified baton training instructor has attested under penalty of perjury that the applicant has successfully completed the baton training course specified in Section 7585.9 within the six months preceding
 the month of the permit’s expiration.

(B) The applicant shall not be the same person as the attesting certified training instructor, and shall not self-certify as having successfully met the requirement of this paragraph.

(4) The application is accompanied by the baton renewal fee prescribed in this chapter.

(c) An expired baton permit shall not be renewed. A person with an expired baton permit shall apply for a new baton permit in the manner required pursuant to Section 7584.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 7584.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7584.6.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 32.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Firearms and Baton Training Facilities [7585. - 7585.20.]

7585.

(a) The course of training in the carrying and usage of firearms, the satisfactory completion of which shall be required of applicants who wish to obtain a firearms qualification card, shall be in the format prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs as delineated in the bureau’s “Firearms Training Manual.” The course of training contained in the manual shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Moral and legal aspects of firearms usage.

(2) Firearms nomenclature and maintenance.

(3) Weapon handling and shooting fundamentals.

(4) Emergency procedures.

(5) Prequalification range training, including the firing of practice rounds.

(6) Qualification course of fire.

(7) Examination which has been provided by the bureau of the subject matter taught.

(8) The appropriate use of force, as described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 7583.7.

(b) The bureau’s development, adoption, amendment, or repeal of the Firearms Training Manual is exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 34.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.1.

For purposes of this article, “firearms course” means the firearms training course as outlined in Section 7585.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.2.

The firearms requalification course shall consist of the successful completion of a firearms requalification course approved by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.3.
